Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WOMEN'S ENVIRONMENTAL INSTITUTE.new text end new text begin (a) $150,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $150,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of agriculture for a grant to the Women's Environmental Institute to develop a farming incubator project for aspiring Black, Indigenous, and People of Color farmers to increase equitable access to affordable, high-quality food production, affordable access to organically certified land, and development of organic and regenerative farming skills and practices. This appropriation must be used to: new text end new text begin (1) provide direct grants to farmers experiencing limited land access as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 17.133, subdivision 1, to cover the costs of land rental, purchasing seeds, compost, irrigation and other farm equipment and supplies, marketing expenses, transportation expenses, certifications for organic produce, and other directly related farm expenses; new text end new text begin (2) fund administrative, outreach, and recruitment costs; new text end new text begin (3) hire a farming incubator project coordinator; new text end new text begin (4) develop and provide additional farming infrastructure needed at the Women's Environmental Institute to support participation in the farming incubator project; new text end new text begin (5) provide farming production supplies, food processing equipment, and needed space to the farming incubator project participants; and new text end new text begin (6) provide education and training in regenerative organic farming methods that include food safety practices, farm finances and budgeting, compost and organic soil health practice, and marketing. new text end new text begin (b) One-third of the money appropriated under this section must be allocated to communities outside the seven-county metropolitan area as defined in Minnesota Statutes, section 473.121, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (c) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2028. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end